Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1904
Interpretative fluoroscopic procedures, defined.

Interpretative fluoroscopic procedures means the use of radiation in continuous mode to provide information, data, and film or hardcopy images for diagnostic review and interpretation by a licensed practitioner as the images are being produced.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 642.